Utah statutes.
53-5b-202.   Required markings.

A firearm, firearm action, or firearm receiver manufactured or sold in Utah under this chapter must have the words "Made in Utah" or "Made in UT" clearly stamped on a central metallic part, such as the receiver or frame.



Enacted by Chapter 5, 2010 General Session

